Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB673.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Riparian Buffer Protection Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Environmental Protection of the Commonwealth."Exceptional value." Exceptional value that satisfies the 1234567891011121314151617181920 provisions of 25 Pa. Code § 93.4b(b) (relating to qualifying as high quality or exceptional value waters)."Floodplain." A land area that:(1) is susceptible to flooding; and(2) has at least a 1% probability of flooding occurring in a calendar year based on the basin being fully developed as shown on a current land use plan. For an area without a mapped one hundred-year floodplain, the one hundred-year floodplain is considered to extend for a horizontal distance of 50 feet from the top of the stream bank."High quality." Surface water having quality that exceeds levels necessary to support propagation of fish, shellfish, wildlife and recreation in and on the water by satisfying the provisions of 25 Pa. Code § 93.4b(a)."Impaired riparian buffer." A riparian buffer that, as a result of land development activity, contains impervious cover or is no longer a natural riparian buffer."Impervious cover." A surface that does not readily absorb precipitation and surface water. The term includes:(1) A building.(2) A parking area.(3) A driveway.(4) A road.(5) A sidewalk.(6) A swimming pool.(7) An area in concrete, asphalt, packed stone or an equivalent surface, including a surface with a coefficient of runoff of 0.7 or higher.(8) Disturbed soil with a bulk density of 95% of the value at which plant growth limitation is expected for 20250HB0673PN0687 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 average plant material."Land development." A land change, including clearing, grubbing, stripping, removal of vegetation, tree cutting, dredging, grading, excavating, transporting and filling of land, construction, subdivision, paving or other increase in impervious cover."Land development activity." An act that comprises, facilitates or results in land development."Municipality." A political subdivision of this Commonwealth, including a county, city, borough, township, incorporated town or home rule municipality."Natural riparian buffer." A riparian buffer dominated by native vegetation, including trees, shrubs or herbaceous plants, and providing any of the following functions:(1) maintaining the integrity of an adjacent stream channel or shoreline or helping stabilize a stream bank, including reducing erosion;(2) reducing the impact of an upland source of pollution by trapping, filtering or converting sediments, nutrients or other contaminants;(3) supplying food, cover, shelter, habitat or thermal protection to fish, other aquatic life or other wildlife;(4) protecting or benefiting the ecological and absorptive capacity of soil, floodplain or wetland area;(5) increasing storage and infiltration of floodwater and reducing floodwater velocity; or(6) reducing the impact of climate change by absorbing greenhouse gases."Nontidal wetland." An area not influenced by tidal fluctuations that is inundated or saturated by surface water or 20250HB0673PN0687 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 groundwater at a frequency and duration sufficient to support, and under normal circumstances supports a prevalence of vegetation typically adapted for life in saturated soil conditions."One hundred-year floodplain." The area of land adjacent to a stream that is subject to inundation during a storm event that has a recurrence interval of 100 years."Ordinance." An ordinance adopted by a municipality for riparian buffers."Permit." A final permit issued by a municipality for undertaking a land development activity."Person." An individual, partnership, firm, association, joint venture, public or private corporation, trust, estate, commission, board, public or private institution, utility, cooperative, city, county or other political subdivision and an interstate body or other legal entity."Pollution." Contamination of waters of this Commonwealth, including contamination by alteration of the physical, chemical or biological properties of the waters, or change in temperature, taste, color or odor of the waters, or the discharge of a liquid, gaseous, radioactive, solid or other substance into the waters that does, will or is likely to:(1) degrade water quality;(2) create a nuisance;(3) render waters harmful, detrimental or injurious to:(i) public health, safety or welfare;(ii) domestic, municipal, commercial, industrial, agricultural, recreational or other legitimate beneficial use; or(iii) livestock, wild animals, birds or fish or 20250HB0673PN0687 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 other aquatic life; or(4) cause or contribute to the failure of a water body to meet applicable water quality standards or criteria enacted by the Commonwealth or a river basin commission of which the Commonwealth is a voting member."Riparian." Belonging or related to the bank of a water body, river, stream, wetland, lake, pond or impoundment."Riparian buffer area." An area adjacent to a water body."Riparian buffer restoration." Returning an impaired riparian buffer to a natural riparian buffer dominated by native vegetation, including trees, shrubs or herbaceous plants."Sewage facility." As used in the act of January 24, 1966 (1965 P.L.1535, No.537), known as the Pennsylvania Sewage Facilities Act."Stream." A perennial or intermittent watercourse with a defined channel, bed and banks."Stream bank." Sloping land that contains a stream channel and the normal flow of the stream."Stream channel." The part of a watercourse either naturally or artificially created that contains an intermittent or perennial base flow of groundwater origin. A base flow of groundwater origin may be distinguished by any of the following physical indicators:(1) Hydrophytic vegetation, hydric soil or other hydrologic indicators in the area where groundwater enters the stream channel in the vicinity of the stream headwaters, channel bed or channel banks.(2) Flowing water not directly related to a storm event. (3) A historical record of a local high groundwater table, including a well or stream gauge record.20250HB0673PN0687 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Vernal pond." A small body of standing water that forms in the spring from meltwater and is often dry by midsummer or may be dry before the end of the spring growing season."Water body." A natural or manmade pond, lake, wetland, impoundment, stream or watercourse. The term does not include a pond or facility designed and constructed solely to contain storm water."Watercourse." A channel of conveyance of surface water having a defined bed and banks, including a stream, river, brook or creek, whether natural or artificial, with perennial, intermittent or seasonal flow. The term does not include a channel or ditch designed and constructed solely to carry storm water."Watershed." The land area that drains into a particular stream, water body or watercourse.Section 3. Protection of existing riparian buffers.(a) Prohibition.--Except as otherwise provided in this act, land development may not be permitted within a riparian buffer area.(b) Width of riparian buffer area.--Except as required under subsection (c), the width of the riparian buffer area protected under subsection (a) shall be a minimum of 100 feet on each side of the stream as measured from the top of the bank.(c) Additional width requirements.--(1) If the water body is designated as high quality or exceptional value, the minimum width shall be 300 feet on each side of the water body as measured from the top of the bank.(2) In the case of the presence of a nontidal wetland or vernal pond wholly or partially within the riparian buffer 20250HB0673PN0687 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 area, an additional 25 feet shall be added to the widths under this section from the wetland or vernal pond boundary.(3) The following additional distances shall be added to the minimum widths under this section based on the following formula:(i) ten feet if slope is 10% - 15%;(ii) twenty feet if slope is 16% - 17%;(iii) thirty feet if slope is 18% - 20%;(iv) fifty feet if slope is 21% - 23%;(v) sixty feet if slope is 24% - 25%; or(vi) seventy feet if slope exceeds 25%.(4) If the water body has been identified as impaired in accordance with 33 U.S.C. § 1313 (relating to water quality standards and implementation plans) and implementing State regulations, an additional 50 feet shall be added to the minimum 100-foot width. In the case of a water body that has been identified as impaired by the department, the developer may choose to either extend the riparian buffer area an additional 50 feet from the top of the bank beyond the other requirements or to implement the following improvements in the riparian buffer area and in the developed area adjacent to the riparian buffer area:(i) The improvements to the buffer area shall be as follows:(A) Fifty percent or more of trees planted in the riparian buffer area must be of two-inch caliper or greater. Tree species composition shall consist of a diverse mix of native tree species planted in the proper hydrologic zone as listed in Appendix B of the Pennsylvania Stormwater Best Management Practices 20250HB0673PN0687 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Manual.(B) An applicant shall develop and implement an operation and maintenance plan for the riparian buffer to be approved by the department. The operation and maintenance plan shall require maintenance activities for a minimum of five years, include measures to control invasive species, deer and rodent damage and require replacement of all deceased trees for a minimum of the first three years.(C) An applicant shall provide permanent protection of a riparian buffer area by placing a conservation easement on the property.(ii) The improvements to the adjacent area shall be as follows:(A) Achieve no net increase in predevelopment to postdevelopment volume, rate, peak and concentration of pollutants in water quality using alternative site design, low-impact development principles, such as limiting disturbance, infiltration best management practices and other environmentally sound storm water best management practices.(B) Through deed restriction for the lots sold and as a condition of a final land development plan approval, ban the use of fertilizers, pesticides, herbicides or other chemicals on lawns and other portions of the property, except that herbicides may be used for invasive species control in riparian buffer areas if part of an operation and maintenance plan approved by the department.20250HB0673PN0687 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (C) A development shall replace the trees removed during the development process with the caliper of removed trees matched by the sum of the caliper of replacement trees.(d) Condition of other approvals and permits.--Full compliance with the provisions of this act shall be a condition of an approval or permit issued by a Commonwealth agency or any political subdivision, including the following:(1) An approval of land development activity.(2) A building permit.(3) A zoning hearing board approval.(4) A conditional use approval.(5) A subdivision approval.(6) An erosion and sediment control permit.(7) A grading permit.(8) An encroachment permit.(9) A National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit.(10) An approval for a planning module for a sewage facility.Section 4. Restoration of impaired riparian buffers.(a) Condition.--For a property with an impaired riparian buffer, riparian buffer restoration shall be a condition of a governmental approval or permit, including the following:(1) An approval of land development activity.(2) A building permit.(3) A zoning hearing board approval.(4) A conditional use approval.(5) A subdivision approval.(6) An erosion and sediment control permit.20250HB0673PN0687 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (7) A grading permit.(8) An encroachment permit.(9) A National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit.(10) An approval for a planning module for a sewage facility.(b) Requirement.--Riparian buffer restoration shall conform to the width requirements as specified under section 3.(c) Trees and plants.--As part of riparian buffer restoration, 50% or more of the trees planted in the riparian buffer area must be of two-inch caliper or greater. Plant species composition shall consist of a diverse mix of native species planted in the proper hydrologic zone as listed in Appendix B of the Pennsylvania Stormwater Best Management Practices Manual.Section 5. Exemptions.(a) Land development activity.--The following land uses shall be exempt from a prohibition or requirement under section 3 or 4:(1) A land use existing as of the effective date of this section, except as follows:(i) when the existing land use or a building or structure involved in the use is enlarged, increased or extended to occupy a greater area of land;(ii) when the existing land use or a building or structure involved in the use is moved, in whole or in part, to another portion of the property; or(iii) when the existing land use ceases for a period of more than one year.(2) Agricultural production that is consistent with 20250HB0673PN0687 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Federal and State law, the regulations promulgated by the department and best management practices established by the State Conservation Commission and the Department of Agriculture.(3) Selective logging provided that the logging practices comply with the best management practices established by the Bureau of Forestry, provided the logging does not occur within 100 feet of a stream.(4) A crossing by a transportation facility or utility line. The issuance of a permit for a use or activity under this paragraph is contingent upon the completion of:(i) A feasibility study that identifies alternative routing strategies that do not impact a riparian buffer area.(ii) A mitigation plan to minimize impacts on the riparian buffer area utilizing natural channel design practices to the greatest degree possible.(5) A temporary stream restoration project, stream bank restoration project or vegetation restoration project to restore the stream or riparian zone to an ecologically healthy state utilizing natural channel design practices to the greatest degree possible.(6) A structure, including a United States Geological Survey gauging station, public water supply, intake structure or permitted discharge outfall that, by its nature, cannot be located anywhere except within the riparian buffer area. The structures shall provide for the minimum practicable disturbance of the riparian buffer area by minimizing size and location and by taking advantage of collocation, if possible. A storm water conveyance structure or outfall shall 20250HB0673PN0687 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 not be included under this paragraph and shall be located outside of the buffer area.(7) A wildlife and fisheries management activity consistent with the purposes of the following:(i) The act of December 5, 1972 (P.L.1277, No.283), known as the Pennsylvania Scenic Rivers Act.(ii) The act of April 28, 1978 (P.L.87, No.41), known as the Pennsylvania Appalachian Trail Act.(iii) The act of June 23, 1982 (P.L.597, No.170), known as the Wild Resource Conservation Act.(iv) 30 Pa.C.S. (relating to fish).(v) 34 Pa.C.S. (relating to game).(8) Construction of a single-family residence, including the usual appurtenances, if:(i) Based on the size, shape or topography of the property, as of the effective date of this section, it is not reasonably possible to construct a single-family dwelling without encroaching upon the riparian buffer area.(ii) The land development conforms with all other zoning and land use regulations.(iii) The dwelling is not located, in whole or part, in a one hundred-year floodplain.(iv) A septic tank, septic drain field or other sewage management facility is not located within the riparian buffer area.(v) To the maximum extent practicable the dwelling avoids disturbance of the riparian buffer area.(vi) An encroachment into the riparian buffer area is offset by an equal amount of wider riparian buffer 20250HB0673PN0687 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 width elsewhere on the same property so the average width and total area of the riparian buffer meet the requirements as specified in section 3.(vii) The construction, dwelling or property was not originally presented for approval and following the effective date of this section, is not part of a multilot subdivision.(9) Low-impact outdoor recreation facilities for public use that are water dependent, including a dock or boat launch, provided that the facility contains less than 500 square feet of new impervious surface.(10) Multiuse paths, access ways, trails, interpretive and educational displays or overlooks, provided that:(i) Overlooks or interpretive or educational displays minimize to the greatest degree possible and, individually and collectively, result in less than 500 square feet of buffer disturbance.(ii) Trails shall:(A) be part of a regional development plan;(B) if possible, be located within the boundaries of an existing travel corridor;(C) not solely serve a single residence, business or residential development;(D) be constructed using nonhazardous, pervious materials with a maximum width of four feet;(E) be located at least 50 feet from the edge of a bank; and(F) if the trail is new and is not located within the boundaries of an existing travel corridor, be fully compensated for by additional buffer 20250HB0673PN0687 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 protection or restoration along the length of the trail route.(11) Other uses permitted by the department under the act of June 22, 1937 (P.L.1987, No.394), known as The Clean Streams Law, and the act of November 26, 1978 (P.L.1375, No.325), known as the Dam Safety and Encroachments Act.(b) Requirements.--The exempted uses, structures and activities shall comply with the requirements of 25 Pa. Code Ch. 102 (relating to erosion and sediment control) and the applicable best management practices and may not diminish water quality except as permitted by the department.(c) Location.--The exempted uses shall be located as far from the stream bank as reasonably possible.Section 6. Municipal authority.(a) Authority.--A municipality may enact a local land use ordinance to protect, preserve and restore riparian buffers. A riparian buffer ordinance adopted by a municipality shall conform to this act.(b) Existing ordinance.--A municipality that has enacted a riparian buffer ordinance prior to the effective date of this section may continue to enforce the ordinance until:(1) the municipality revises or amends the ordinance; or(2) the municipality is required by law to update a municipal ordinance necessary to implement an applicable watershed storm water management plan under the act of October 4, 1978 (P.L.864, No.167), known as the Storm Water Management Act, or fulfill a legal obligation regarding its Municipal Separate Storm Sewer Program or total maximum daily load. At this time, the municipality shall amend the ordinance to conform to the provisions of this act.20250HB0673PN0687 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Variances.--A municipality that enacts an ordinance under this act shall provide for the consideration of variances. The following apply:(1) In granting a variance, the municipality may allow the buffer width to be relaxed and the permitted buffer area to become narrower at some points as long as the average width and total area meet the requirements under section 3. The averaging of the buffer area may be used to allow for the presence of an existing structure or to recover a lost lot, however, the buffer width may not be narrowed by more than 25%, and new land development activity may not take place within the one hundred-year floodplain.(2) The municipality may offer credit for additional density elsewhere on the site in compensation for the loss of developable land due to the requirements of this act. The compensation may increase the total number of dwelling units on the site up to the amount permitted under the base zoning requirements.(3) A municipality may grant a variance if the applicant demonstrates any of the following:(i) Strict compliance would prevent all economic use of the property or constitute a legally defined taking.(ii) The project would serve a public need and no feasible alternative is available.(iii) The project consists of the repair and maintenance of public improvements where avoidance and minimization of adverse impacts to the riparian buffer area have been addressed.(4) The following procedures apply:(i) An applicant shall submit a written request for 20250HB0673PN0687 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a variance to the municipality. The application shall include specific reasons justifying the variance and any other information necessary to evaluate the proposed variance request.(ii) The municipality may require an alternative analysis that clearly demonstrates that no other feasible alternatives exist and that minimal impact will occur as a result of the project or development.(iii) In granting a request for a variance, the municipality may require additional site design, landscape planting, fencing, the placement of signs and the establishment of water quality best management practices in order to reduce impacts on water quality, wetlands and floodplains.(d) Inspections.--The municipality may conduct investigations where probable cause exists to carry out its authority as specified under this act. For this purpose, the municipality may enter where probable cause exists upon public or private property to investigate and inspect property that contains a riparian buffer.(e) Enforcement.--(1) The zoning enforcement officer or other person designated by the governing body of a municipality shall enforce the requirements of this act in accordance with this section.(2) If, upon inspection or investigation, the zoning enforcement officer or other authorized agent determines that an activity violates the requirements of this act, the activity shall be considered to be in violation of this act.(3) Upon the determination of a violation, the 20250HB0673PN0687 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 municipality shall issue a notice of violation to the permit holder, property owner or party in charge of the activity on the property. The notice must be in writing and require the immediate stoppage of the work on the property. The notice shall include:(i) The name and address of the owner.(ii) The address or description and location of the property where the violation occurred.(iii) A description of the violation.(iv) A description of the corrective actions needed to return to compliance and a time schedule to complete the corrective actions.(4) Where an emergency exists, a written notice shall not be required to stop work. Written notice of the stop-work order shall be presented to the appropriate responsible parties within three business days of the emergency order.Section 7. Powers and duties of department.(a) General authorization.--The department may promulgate regulations and take action to protect, preserve and restore riparian buffers. Riparian buffer regulations adopted by the department shall conform to the provisions of this act.(b) Variance.--The department may grant a variance for a property located in a municipality that does not enact an ordinance under this act.(c) Buffer area.--In granting a variance, the department may allow the buffer width to be relaxed and the permitted buffer area to become narrower at points if the average width and total area meet the requirements under section 3. The averaging of the buffer area may be used to allow for the presence of an existing structure or to recover a lost lot. The buffer width may not be 20250HB0673PN0687 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 narrowed by more than 25%, and new land development activity may not take place within the one hundred-year floodplain.(d) Grant criteria.--The department may grant a variance if an applicant for the variance demonstrates any of the following:(1) Strict compliance would prevent all economic use of the property or constitute a legally defined taking.(2) The project would serve a public need and a feasible alternative is not available.(3) The project consists of the repair and maintenance of public improvements which address avoidance and minimization of adverse impacts to the riparian buffer area.(e) Application requirements.--In determining whether to grant a request for a variance, the following apply:(1) An applicant for a variance must submit a written request for a variance to the department. The application shall include specific reasons justifying the variance and any other information necessary to evaluate the proposed variance.(2) The department shall require an analysis clearly demonstrating that feasible alternatives do not exist and that minimal impact will occur as a result of the project.(3) The department shall require additional site design, landscape planting, fencing, the placement of signs and the establishment of water quality best management practices in order to reduce impacts on water quality, wetlands and floodplains.Section 8. Property inspections.(a) Authorization.--The department may enter upon a property at a reasonable time for the purpose of inspecting property that contains riparian buffers to enforce the provisions of this act.20250HB0673PN0687 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Entry denial prohibited.--A person may not deny entry to any agent of the department conducting an inspection under subsection (a) or otherwise obstruct, hamper or interfere with the agent while conducting the inspection.(c) Violations.--If the department determines that an activity violates the requirements of this act as a result of an investigation under subsection (a), the activity shall be in violation of this act.(d) Violation notice.--Except as provided in subsection (e), upon determining a violation occurred under this act, the department shall issue a written notice of the violation to the permit holder, property owner or party in charge of the activity on the property. The notice shall require the immediate stoppage of all work on the property. The notice shall include all of the following:(1) The name and address of the owner.(2) The address or description of the property where the violation occurred.(3) A description of the violation.(4) A description of the corrective actions needed to return to compliance under this act and a time schedule to complete the corrective actions.(e) Emergency order.--When an emergency exists as determined by the department, the department shall issue a stop-work order and may not provide the written notice required under subsection (d). Written notice as required under subsection (d) shall not be issued later than three business days after the order.Section 9. Delegation to a municipality.(a) Authority to delegate.--The department may delegate to a municipality any responsibilities under this act. The 20250HB0673PN0687 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 municipality acting under the agreement shall have the same powers and duties otherwise vested in the department under this act.(b) Supervision.--The department shall monitor the activities of a municipality that acts under an agreement under subsection (a).(c) Appeals.--No later than 30 days after notice of an action by a municipality under an agreement under subsection (a), a person aggrieved by the action may appeal to the Environmental Hearing Board in accordance with the act of July 13, 1988 (P.L.530, No.94), known as the Environmental Hearing Board Act.Section 10. Municipal action appeals.(a) Appeals.--No later than 10 days after notice of an action by a municipality imposed under this act, a person aggrieved by the action may appeal in writing to the zoning hearing board. No later than 45 days after the zoning hearing board receives the appeal, the person shall receive a hearing before the zoning hearing board.(b) Judicial review.--A person aggrieved by an action of a municipality imposed under this act shall have the right to appeal de novo to the court of common pleas of the county where the municipality is located.Section 11. Penalties, civil action and liability for costs.(a) Penalties.--The penalties that may be assessed for a violation of this act include:(1) If, through inspection, it is determined that the corrective actions specified in a stop-work order have not been completed within the specified time, the responsible party shall be deemed in violation, and in addition to other 20250HB0673PN0687 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 penalties, a performance bond shall be subject to forfeiture. (2) A permit issued by the department or a municipality may be suspended, revoked or modified if, through inspection, it is determined the corrective actions specified in a stop-work order have not been completed within the specified time.(3) A person who violates a provision of this act, regulation or ordinance authorized under this act, permit condition or stop-work order and the owner of the land where the violation occurs shall be liable for a civil penalty of not less than $1,000 and not more than $2,000 per violation per day. Each day the violation continues shall constitute a separate offense.(4) As follows:(i) If a person violates a provision of this act, regulation or ordinance authorized by this act, permitting conditions or stop-work order, the Commonwealth or municipality may issue a citation to the owner of the land where the violation occurs or other responsible person, requiring the person to appear in the appropriate court to answer charges for the violation.(ii) Upon conviction, the owner of the land where the violation occurs or other responsible person shall be liable for a criminal penalty in the form of imprisonment for not more than 90 days or a fine of not less than $1,000 and not more than $2,000 per violation per day, or both. Every day that the violation continues shall be considered a separate offense.(b) Civil action for recovery of damages.--(1) In addition to any other sanction authorized under this act, a person who fails to comply with the provisions of 20250HB0673PN0687 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 this act or a regulation or ordinance authorized by this act shall be liable to the Commonwealth or municipality in a civil action for damages equal to one and one-half times the cost of restoring the buffer.(2) The damages recovered under this subsection shall be used for the restoration of buffer systems or for the administration of programs for the protection and restoration of water quality, streams, wetlands and floodplains.(c) Liability for costs.--A person who violates a provision of this act or a regulation or ordinance authorized by this act may be liable for a cost or expense incurred by the Commonwealth or a municipality as a result.Section 12. Severability.If a provision of this act or a regulation or ordinance authorized by this act is declared invalid or unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, the validity of the remainder shall not be affected by the invalidity or unconstitutionality.Section 13. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0673PN0687 - 22 - 1234567891011121314151617181920